Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-654
Grading upon petition; assessments; bonds.

Whenever the owner of lots and lands abutting upon any street or avenue, alley, or lane, or part thereof, representing three-fourths of the feet front abutting upon any such street, avenue, alley, or lane, or part thereof, shall petition the mayor and city council to grade the street, avenue, alley, or lane, including the intersections of streets, avenues, or lanes and spaces opposite alleys and lanes, without cost to the city, and to assess the entire cost of grading such street, avenue, alley, or lane or part thereof, including the intersections of streets, avenues, or lanes and spaces opposite alleys or lanes, against the lots and lands abutting upon such street, avenue, alley, or lane, or part thereof, so graded, thereupon the mayor and city council shall create grading districts, make assessments, issue bonds, and proceed in the same manner as in cases of grading provided in sections 16-651 and 16-653. Bonds shall be issued to cover the entire cost of grading both the streets, avenues, or alleys, and the intersections of streets or avenues and spaces opposite alleys.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 73, p. 287;

R.S.1913, § 4943;

C.S.1922, § 4111;

C.S.1929, § 16-640;

R.S.1943, § 16-654;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 110.
July 21, 2016